Washington statutes.
RCW 19.150.130

Owner not obligated to provide insurance.

Any insurance protecting the personal property stored within the storage space against fire, theft, or damage is the responsibility of the occupant. The owner is under no obligation to provide insurance.

[ 1988 c 240 s 14.]